Hawaii statutes.
[§556A-15] Fiduciary duty and authority.
(a) The legal duties imposed on a fiduciary charged with managing tangible
property apply to the management of digital assets, including:

(1) The duty of care;

(2) The duty of loyalty; and

(3) The duty of confidentiality.

(b) A fiduciary's or designated recipient's
authority with respect to a digital asset of a user:

(1) Except as otherwise provided in section 556A-4,
is subject to the applicable terms of service;

(2) Is subject to other applicable law, including
copyright law;

(3) In the case of a fiduciary, is limited by the
scope of the fiduciary's duties; and

(4) May not be used to impersonate the user.

(c) A fiduciary with authority over the
property of a decedent, protected person, principal, or settlor has the right
to access any digital asset in which the decedent, protected person, principal,
or settlor had a right or interest and that is not held by a custodian or
subject to a terms-of-service agreement.

(d) A fiduciary acting within the scope of the
fiduciary's duties is an authorized user of the property of the decedent,
protected person, principal, or settlor for the purpose of applicable computer
fraud and unauthorized computer access laws, including part IX of chapter 708.

(e) A fiduciary with authority over the
tangible, personal property of a decedent, protected person, principal, or
settlor:

(1) Has the right to access the property and any
digital asset stored in it; and

(2) Is an authorized user for the purpose of computer
fraud and unauthorized computer access laws, including part IX of chapter 708.

(f) A custodian may disclose information in an
account to a fiduciary of the user when the information is required to
terminate an account used to access digital assets licensed to the user.

(g) A fiduciary of a user may request a
custodian to terminate the user's account. A request for termination must be
in writing, in either physical or electronic form, and accompanied by:

(1) If the user is deceased, a certified copy of the
death certificate of the user;

(2) A certified copy of the letter of appointment of
the representative or a small estate affidavit or court order, court order,
power of attorney, or trust giving the fiduciary authority over the account;
and

(3) If requested by the custodian:

(A) A number, username, address, or other
unique subscriber or account identifier assigned by the custodian to identify
the user's account;

(B) Evidence linking the account to the user;
or

(C) A finding by the court that the user had
a specific account with the custodian, identifiable by the information
specified in subparagraph (A). [L 2016, c 162, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next